Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 3. Transition of Employees

§ 1801.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“New District” means a district created by the realignment or merger of two or more current districts into a new supervisory district, union school district, or any other form of merged or realigned district authorized by law, including by chapter 11, subchapter 1, of this title, regardless of whether one or more of the districts creating the New District (a Realigning District) is a town school district, a city school district, an incorporated school district, a union school district, a unified union school district, or a supervisory district.

“New SU” means a supervisory union created from the merger or realignment of two or more current supervisory unions or of all or some of the districts in one or more current supervisory unions (a Realigning SU). “New SU” also means a supervisory union created by the State Board’s adjustment of the borders of one or more current supervisory unions or parts of supervisory unions pursuant to section 261 of this title or otherwise, regardless of whether the New SU is known by the name of one of the current supervisory unions or the adjustment is otherwise structured or considered to be one in which one current supervisory union (the Absorbing SU) is absorbing one or more other supervisory unions or parts of supervisory unions into the Absorbing SU.

“Employees of a Realigning Entity” means the licensed and nonlicensed employees of a Realigning District or Realigning SU, or both, that create the New District or New SU, and includes employees of an Absorbing SU and employees of a Realigning SU whose functions will be performed by employees of a New District that is a supervisory district.

“System” shall mean the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System created pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 125.

“Transitional Board” means the board created prior to the first day of a New District’s or a New SU’s existence in order to transition to the new structure by negotiating and entering into contracts, preparing an initial proposed budget, adopting policies, and otherwise planning for implementation of the New District or New SU, and includes the board of an Absorbing District to which members from the other Realigning SU or SUs have been added in order to perform transitional responsibilities.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 46

, § 43, eff. June 2, 2015.

§ 1802.
Transition of employees to newly created employer.

Prior to the first day of a New District’s or a new SU’s existence, upon creation of the Transitional Board, the Board shall:

appoint a negotiations council for the New District or New SU for the purpose of negotiating with future employees’ representatives; and

recognize the representatives of the Employees of the Realigning Districts or Realigning SUs as the recognized representatives of the employees of the New District or New SU.

Negotiations shall commence within 90 days after formation of the Transitional Board and shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 57 of this title for teachers and administrators and pursuant to 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 for other employees.

An Employee of a Realigning District or Realigning SU who was not a probationary employee shall not be considered a probationary employee of the New District or New SU.

If a new agreement is not ratified by both parties prior to the first day of the New District’s or New SU’s existence, then:

the parties shall comply with the existing agreements in place for Employees of the Realigning Districts or the Realigning SUs until a new agreement is reached;

the parties shall adhere to the provisions of an agreement among the Employees of the Realigning Districts or the Realigning SUs, as represented by their respective recognized representatives, regarding how provisions under the existing contracts regarding issues of seniority, reduction in force, layoff, and recall will be reconciled during the period prior to ratification of a new agreement; and

a new employee beginning employment after the first day of the New District’s or New SU’s existence shall be covered by the agreement in effect that applies to the largest bargaining unit for Employees of the Realigning Districts in the New District or for Employees of the Realigning SU in the New SU.

On the first day of its existence, the New District or New SU shall assume the obligations of existing individual employment contracts, including accrued leaves and associated benefits, with the Employees of the Realigning Districts.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 46

, § 43, eff. June 2, 2015.

§ 1803.
Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System.

A New District or New SU, on the first day of its existence, shall assume the responsibilities of any one or more of the Realigning Districts or Realigning SUs that have been participants in the System; provided, however, that this subsection shall not be construed to extend benefits to an employee who would not otherwise be a member of the System under any other provision of law.

The existing membership and benefits of an Employee of a Realigning District or a Realigning SU shall not be impaired or reduced either by negotiations with the New District or New SU under 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 or otherwise.

In addition to general responsibility for the operation of the System pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 5062(a)

, the responsibility for implementation of all sections of this subchapter relating to the System is vested in the Retirement Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 46

, § 43, eff. June 2, 2015.